Utah statutes.
58-50-5.   Qualifications for licensure.
An applicant for licensure as a private probation provider shall:
(1)  have a baccalaureate degree in a program approved by the division in
collaboration with the board or have a combination of equivalent education and
training as determined by the division in collaboration with the board;
(2)  submit evidence that a business license to engage in private probation
has been issued by the political subdivision of the state in which the
applicant intends to establish his business office or offices; and
(3)  apply for licensure and pay the required fees.
